District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.14

Applications for commemorative works.

Any sponsor may propose the placement of a commemorative work on public space in the District. Any proposal for a commemorative work on public space in the District shall be accompanied by a completed application to the Committee by a sponsor. The Mayor shall develop a procedure for receiving applications for commemorative works. The Mayor shall publish in theD.C. Register the application procedure, including all information required for the application to be complete.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 414
as added Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-275, § 2(d), 48 DCR 1660
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Commemorative Works on Public Space Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-564, January 31, 2001, 48 DCR 1627).